Hawaii statutes.
[§11-406] Waiver of further
proceedings. The commission may waive further proceedings due to action
the respondent takes to remedy or correct the alleged violation, including the
payment of any administrative fine. The commission shall make the remedial or
corrective action taken by the respondent, the commission's decision in light
of the action to waive further proceedings, and the commission's justification
for its decision a part of the public record. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next